Hawaii statutes.
§147-9 Certificate as evidence. Any
certificate made by an inspector pursuant to section 147-7 or any written
finding of the board of agriculture pursuant to section 147-8 shall be
admissible in evidence in all courts of the State as presumptive evidence of
all facts and matters therein stated. [L 1945, c 252, §9; RL 1955, §22-8; am L
Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §147-9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next